trunk/incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
    <pardef n="ó_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l>
          <r>ó</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-ó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÓ</l>
          <r>Ó<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-ó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÓ</l>
          <r>Ó<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="u_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-u</l>
          <r>u<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nU</l>
          <r>U<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-u</l>
          <r>u<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tU</l>
          <r>U<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>u<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ú_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ú</l>
          <r>ú</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-ú</l>
          <r>ú<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÚ</l>
          <r>Ú<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-ú</l>
          <r>ú<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÚ</l>
          <r>Ú<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hú</l>
          <r>ú<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="an__itg">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="agus__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="an__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="le__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liom</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leat</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lies</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>léi</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>linn</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>libh</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leo</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ag__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agam</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agat</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aige</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aici</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>againn</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agaibh</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>acu</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ca/ra__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rad</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irde</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irde</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irde</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irde</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ca/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ear__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eara</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="ar"><i>ar</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="nach"><i>nach</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="nár"><i>nár</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cá"><i>cá</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cad"><i>cad</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="céard"><p><l>céard</l><r>cad</r></p><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cé"><i>cé</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cathain"><i>cathain</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="conas"><i>conas</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cad a"><i>cad<b/>a</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="céard a"><p><l>céard<b/>a</l><r>cad<b/>a</r></p><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cé a"><i>cé<b/>a</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cathain a"><i>cathain<b/>a</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="conas a"><i>conas<b/>a</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cén fáth"><i>cén<b/>fáth</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><par n="an__det"/></e>
    <e lm="agus">agus<par n="agus__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ach">ach<par n="agus__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ag"><par n="ag__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="le"><par n="le__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="úll"><par n="ú_init"/><par n="ú/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="urlár"><par n="u_init"/><i>rlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
